Utah statutes.
70A-2a-522.   Lessee's right to goods on lessor's insolvency.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2) and even though the goods have not been shipped, a lessee who has paid a part or all of the rent and security for goods identified to a lease contract as provided in Section 70A-2a-217 on making and keeping good a tender of any unpaid portion of the rent and security due under the lease contract may recover the goods identified from the lessor if the lessor becomes insolvent within 10 days after receipt of the first installment of rent and security.

(2)  A lessee acquires the right to recover goods identified to a lease contract only if they conform to the lease contract.

